Massachusetts, session 194th, H3154.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 38NN the following section:-
Section 38OO. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Food business”, any entity located in the commonwealth that is engaged in the business
of farming as defined under section 1A of chapter 128 or meets the definition of a restaurant
under section 1 of chapter 138 or meets the definition of a food department or food store as both
are defined under section 184B of chapter 94.
“Nonprofit food distribution organization”, means an entity located in the commonwealth
that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended
or renumbered, and organized with a principal purpose of providing food to the needy or selling
food at a charge sufficient only to cover the cost of handling such food.
of 4

(b) A food business that donates food, meals or crops grown, manufactured, packaged or
prepared by the food business in the commonwealth to a nonprofit food distribution organization
shall be allowed a non-refundable credit from its net taxable income for the taxable year of the
donation. The credit shall be equal to the fair market value of the food, meals or crops donated
by the business during the taxable year but not to exceed an aggregate credit of $25,000
annually.
(c) A credit shall be allowed under this section only if the donated food, meals or crops
are distributed or served by the donee nonprofit food distribution organization without charge or
at a charge sufficient only to cover the cost of handling such food; and are not (i) transferred for
use outside the commonwealth; (ii) used by the donee nonprofit food distribution organization as
consideration for services performed or personal property purchased; or (iii) sold by the donee
nonprofit food distribution organization at a charge in excess of the organization’s cost of
handling the food, meals or crops.
(d) In order to claim any credit under this section, the donor business shall attach to the
business’s income tax return a written certification prepared by the donee nonprofit food
distribution organization. The written certification prepared by the donee organization shall
identify the donee nonprofit food distribution organization, the business donating food, the date
of the donation, the number of pounds of food donated and the fair market value of the food
donated. The certification shall also include a statement by the donee nonprofit food distribution
organization that its use and disposition of the food complies with the requirements under this
section.
of 4

(e) The commissioner shall promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation,
administration and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 94 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking section 328
and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 328. (a) No person or any entity engaged in the business of farming as defined
under section 1A of chapter 128 or restaurant as defined under section 1 of chapter 138 or food
department or food store as both are defined under section 184B of chapter 94, who donates
food, including open-dated food whose date has passed, but not including alcoholic beverages,
marijuana products or dietary supplements, to either: (i) a nonprofit corporation for distribution
or serving by such nonprofit corporation without charge or at a charge sufficient only to cover
the cost of handling such food, or; (ii) any other person for consumption by that person, shall be
liable for civil damages for any injury arising out of the condition of such food.
(b) No nonprofit corporation which distributes or serves food donated pursuant to this
section without charge or at a charge sufficient only to cover the cost of handling such food,
including open-dated food whose date has passed, shall be liable for civil damages for any injury
arising out of the condition of such food. No food department or food store, as both are defined
in section 184B of chapter 94, which distributes or serves food, not including alcoholic
beverages, marijuana products or dietary supplements, without charge or at a charge sufficient
only to cover the cost of handling such food, including open-dated food whose date has passed,
shall be liable for civil damages for any injury arising out of the condition of such food. Any
such nonprofit corporation, food department or food store distributing or serving food under this
section must remain in compliance with all inspection or permit requirements of the department
of 4

of public health and the board of health in the city or town where the food is distributed or
served. No fee shall be required for any permit needed solely for the distribution or service of
food pursuant to this section.
(c) No license shall be required for the preparation of food in private homes for donation
to a nonprofit corporation for distribution or serving by such corporation without charge.
(d) This section shall not apply if the donated, distributed or served food: (i) is
misbranded or adulterated; (ii) was manufactured, processed, prepared, handled or stored in
violation of regulations of the department of public health; or (iii) causes an injury arising out of
the food’s condition that is the result of gross negligence, recklessness or intentional misconduct
of the donating, distributing or serving person or entity or any person employed by or under the
control of the same.
of 4